Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; METROPOLITAN COUNCIL AQUATIC INVASIVE SPECIES GRANTS.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for grants to implementing agencies of the Metropolitan Council regional parks system for initiatives to reduce the spread of aquatic invasive species. This appropriation may be used for prevention, containment, control, and enforcement for managing aquatic invasive species. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end